Massachusetts, session 194th, H4570.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding section 17 of chapter 138 of the General Laws or any
other general or special, rule or regulation to the contrary, the licensing authority of the Town of
Pembroke may grant one (1) additional license for the retail of alcohol beverages under section
15 of said chapter 138 to be exercised at and located at 256 Church Street (Parcel ID: G15-38). A
license granted under this section shall be subject to all of said chapter 138 except said section
17.
(b) Once issued, the licensing authority shall not approve the transfer of the license issued
under subsection (a) to any other location, but it may grant the license to a new applicant at the
same location if the applicant files with the authority a letter from the department of revenue and
a letter from the department of unemployment assistance indicating the license is in good
standing with those departments and that all applicable taxes, fees and contributions have been
paid.
of 2

(c) If the license granted under this section is cancelled, revoked or no longer in use, it
shall be returned physically, with all of the legal rights, privileges and restrictions pertaining
thereto, to the licensing authority, which may then grant the license to a new applicant at the
same or a different location.
of 2